Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-721
Notices; mailing
requirements.

All notices by the department required
by the motor fuel laws shall be mailed to the
address of the licensee or permitholder as shown on the records of the department.

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 116;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 23.